Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before June 30, 2027, Curry County  shall expedite any applications for
land use planning, building permits, business  licensing, public health or restaurant licensing,
or any other permit related to the operation or use of the land for any development on lands
within the county that are:
(1) On a tract, as defined in ORS 215.010, that is larger than 125 acres; and
(2) Sited north of the city limits of the City of Port Orford, west of U.S. Highway 101 and
south of the Elk River.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  the Water Resources Depart-
ment shall expedite the review  of any complete application or subsequent application decision
related to the authorization for the development and use of  groundwater, including storage
of groundwater, on the lands described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1047 (SB 1047-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1047 (SB 1047-B) Page 2